Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.060

Costs to defendant.

In all cases where costs and disbursements are not allowed to the plaintiff, the defendant shall be entitled to have judgment in his or her favor for the same.

[ 2011 c 336 s 122; Code 1881 s 510; 1877 p 109 s 514; 1869 p 123 s 462; 1854 p 202 s 372; RRS s 479.]